Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.030

Terms of commissioners.

(1) Except as provided otherwise in subsection (2) of this section, the terms of office of county commissioners shall be four years and shall extend until their successors are elected and qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW 29A.60.280. The terms of office of county commissioners shall be staggered so that either one or two commissioners are elected at a general election held in each even-numbered year.

(2) At the general election held in 2022, any noncharter county with a population of four hundred thousand or more must elect county commissioners in accordance with a districting plan adopted under RCW 36.32.054. Any county commissioner whose term is set to expire on or after January 1, 2023, is subject to the new election in accordance with the districting plan. The county commissioners shall begin their terms of office on January 1, 2023, and such terms shall be staggered terms, as designated in the districting plan.

[ 2018 c 301 s 6; 2015 c 53 s 63; 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 27; 1963 c 4 s 36.32.030. Prior: 1951 c 89 s 1. Formerly: (i) 1891 c 97 ss 1, 2; RRS s 4038. (ii) 1891 c 67 s 3; RRS s 4039. (iii) 1891 c 89 s 4; RRS s 4040. (iv) 1891 c 67 s 5; RRS s 4041.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—2018 c 301: See notes following RCW 36.32.051.

Purpose—1979 ex.s. c 126: See RCW 29A.60.280(1).